test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-bakcha_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.

  Noun - бакча: # Noun  бакча 'eng /udm /fin' - full paradigm
     бакча+N+Sg+Nom: бакча
     бакча+N+Sg+Acc: бакчаез
     бакча+N+Sg+Acc: бакчаты #+Dial/North
     бакча+N+Sg+Gen: бакчалэн
     бакча+N+Sg+Abl: бакчалэсь
     бакча+N+Sg+Dat: бакчалы
     бакча+N+Sg+Ins: бакчаэн
     бакча+N+Sg+Abe: бакчатэк
     бакча+N+Sg+Advl: бакчая
     бакча+N+Sg+Ine: бакчаын
     бакча+N+Sg+Ill: бакчае
     бакча+N+Sg+Ela: бакчаысь
     бакча+N+Sg+Egr: бакчаысен
     бакча+N+Sg+Ter: бакчаозь
     бакча+N+Sg+Prl: бакчаэтӥ
     бакча+N+Sg+Apr: бакчалань

     бакча+N+Pl+Nom: бакчаос
     бакча+N+Pl+Acc: бакчаосыз
     бакча+N+Pl+Gen: бакчаослэн
     бакча+N+Pl+Abl: бакчаослэсь
     бакча+N+Pl+Dat: бакчаослы
     бакча+N+Pl+Ins: бакчаосэн
     бакча+N+Pl+Abe: бакчаостэк
     бакча+N+Pl+Advl: бакчаосъя
     бакча+N+Pl+Ine: бакчаосын
     бакча+N+Pl+Ill: бакчаосы
     бакча+N+Pl+Ela: бакчаосысь
     бакча+N+Pl+Egr: бакчаосысен
     бакча+N+Pl+Ter: бакчаосозь
     бакча+N+Pl+Prl: бакчаосэтӥ
     бакча+N+Pl+Apr: бакчаослань

     # possessive, and Cx-Px / Px-Cx

     бакча+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: бакчае
     бакча+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: бакчаед
     бакча+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: бакчаез
     бакча+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: бакчамы
     бакча+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: бакчады
     бакча+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: бакчазы

     бакча+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: бакчаосы
     бакча+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: бакчаосыд
     бакча+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: бакчаосыз
     бакча+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: бакчаосмы
     бакча+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: бакчаосты
     бакча+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: бакчаоссы

     бакча+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: бакчаме
     бакча+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: бакчатэ
     бакча+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: бакчасэ
     бакча+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: бакчамес
     бакча+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: бакчатэс
     бакча+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: бакчасэс

     бакча+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: бакчаосме
     бакча+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: бакчаостэ
     бакча+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: бакчаоссэ
     бакча+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: бакчаосмес
     бакча+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: бакчаостэс
     бакча+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: бакчаоссэс

     бакча+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: бакчаелэн
     бакча+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: бакчаедлэн
     бакча+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: бакчаезлэн
     бакча+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: бакчамылэн
     бакча+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: бакчатылэн
     бакча+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: бакчасылэн

     бакча+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: бакчаосылэн
     бакча+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: бакчаосыдлэн
     бакча+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: бакчаосызлэн
     бакча+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: бакчаосмылэн
     бакча+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: бакчаостылэн
     бакча+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: бакчаоссылэн

     бакча+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: бакчаелэсь
     бакча+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: бакчаедлэсь
     бакча+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: бакчаезлэсь
     бакча+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: бакчамылэсь
     бакча+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: бакчатылэсь
     бакча+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: бакчасылэсь

     бакча+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: бакчаосылэсь
     бакча+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: бакчаосыдлэсь
     бакча+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: бакчаосызлэсь
     бакча+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: бакчаосмылэсь
     бакча+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: бакчаостылэсь
     бакча+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: бакчаоссылэсь

     бакча+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: бакчаелы
     бакча+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: бакчаедлы
     бакча+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: бакчаезлы
     бакча+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: бакчамылы
     бакча+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: бакчатылы
     бакча+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: бакчасылы

     бакча+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: бакчаосылы
     бакча+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: бакчаосыдлы
     бакча+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: бакчаосызлы
     бакча+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: бакчаосмылы
     бакча+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: бакчаостылы
     бакча+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: бакчаоссылы

     бакча+N+Sg+Ins+PxSg1: бакчаеным
     бакча+N+Sg+Ins+PxSg2: бакчаеныд
     бакча+N+Sg+Ins+PxSg3: бакчаеныз
     бакча+N+Sg+Ins+PxPl1: бакчаенымы
     бакча+N+Sg+Ins+PxPl2: бакчаеныды
     бакча+N+Sg+Ins+PxPl3: бакчаенызы

     бакча+N+Pl+Ins+PxSg1: бакчаосыным
     бакча+N+Pl+Ins+PxSg2: бакчаосыныд
     бакча+N+Pl+Ins+PxSg3: бакчаосыныз
     бакча+N+Pl+Ins+PxPl1: бакчаосынымы
     бакча+N+Pl+Ins+PxPl2: бакчаосыныды
     бакча+N+Pl+Ins+PxPl3: бакчаосынызы

     бакча+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg1: бакчаетэк
     бакча+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg2: бакчаедтэк
     бакча+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg3: бакчаезтэк
     бакча+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl1: бакчамытэк
     бакча+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl2: бакчатытэк
     бакча+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl3: бакчасытэк

     бакча+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg1: бакчаосытэк
     бакча+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg2: бакчаосыдтэк
     бакча+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg3: бакчаосызтэк
     бакча+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl1: бакчаосмытэк
     бакча+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl2: бакчаостытэк
     бакча+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl3: бакчаоссытэк

     бакча+N+Sg+Advl+PxSg1: бакчаея
     бакча+N+Sg+Advl+PxSg2: бакчаедъя
     бакча+N+Sg+Advl+PxSg3: бакчаезъя
     бакча+N+Sg+Advl+PxPl1: бакчамыя
     бакча+N+Sg+Advl+PxPl2: бакчатыя
     бакча+N+Sg+Advl+PxPl3: бакчасыя

     бакча+N+Pl+Advl+PxSg1: бакчаосыя
     бакча+N+Pl+Advl+PxSg2: бакчаосыдъя
     бакча+N+Pl+Advl+PxSg3: бакчаосызъя
     бакча+N+Pl+Advl+PxPl1: бакчаосмыя
     бакча+N+Pl+Advl+PxPl2: бакчаостыя
     бакча+N+Pl+Advl+PxPl3: бакчаоссыя

     бакча+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg1: бакчаям
     бакча+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg2: бакчаяд
     бакча+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg3: бакчаяз
     бакча+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl1: бакчаямы
     бакча+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl2: бакчаяды
     бакча+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl3: бакчаязы

     бакча+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg1: бакчаосам
     бакча+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg2: бакчаосад
     бакча+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg3: бакчаосаз
     бакча+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl1: бакчаосамы
     бакча+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl2: бакчаосады
     бакча+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl3: бакчаосазы

     бакча+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: бакчаям
     бакча+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: бакчаяд
     бакча+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: бакчаяз
     бакча+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: бакчаямы
     бакча+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: бакчаяды
     бакча+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: бакчаязы

     бакча+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: бакчаосам
     бакча+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: бакчаосад
     бакча+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: бакчаосаз
     бакча+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: бакчаосамы
     бакча+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: бакчаосады
     бакча+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: бакчаосазы

     бакча+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg1: бакчаысьтым
     бакча+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg2: бакчаысьтыд
     бакча+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg3: бакчаысьтыз
     бакча+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl1: бакчаысьтымы
     бакча+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl2: бакчаысьтыды
     бакча+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl3: бакчаысьтызы

     бакча+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg1: бакчаосысьтым
     бакча+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg2: бакчаосысьтыд
     бакча+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg3: бакчаосысьтыз
     бакча+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl1: бакчаосысьтымы
     бакча+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl2: бакчаосысьтыды
     бакча+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl3: бакчаосысьтызы

     бакча+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg1: бакчаысеным
     бакча+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg2: бакчаысеныд
     бакча+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg3: бакчаысеныз
     бакча+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl1: бакчаысенымы
     бакча+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl2: бакчаысеныды
     бакча+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl3: бакчаысенызы

     бакча+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg1: бакчаосысеным
     бакча+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg2: бакчаосысеныд
     бакча+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg3: бакчаосысеныз
     бакча+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl1: бакчаосысенымы
     бакча+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl2: бакчаосысеныды
     бакча+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl3: бакчаосысенызы

     бакча+N+Pl+Ter+PxSg1: бакчаозям
     бакча+N+Pl+Ter+PxSg2: бакчаозяд
     бакча+N+Pl+Ter+PxSg3: бакчаозяз
     бакча+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl1: [бакчаозямы, бакчамыозь]
     бакча+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl2: [бакчаозяды, бакчатыозь]
     бакча+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl3: [бакчаозязы, бакчасыозь]

     бакча+N+Pl+Ter+PxSg1: бакчаосозям
     бакча+N+Pl+Ter+PxSg2: бакчаосозяд
     бакча+N+Pl+Ter+PxSg3: бакчаосозяз
     бакча+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl1: бакчаосмыозь
     бакча+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl2: бакчаостыозь
     бакча+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl3: бакчаоссыозь

     бакча+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg1: бакчаетӥм
     бакча+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg2: бакчаетӥд
     бакча+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg3: бакчаетӥз
     бакча+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl1: бакчаетӥмы
     бакча+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl2: бакчаетӥды
     бакча+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl3: бакчаетӥзы

     бакча+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg1: бакчаосэтӥм
     бакча+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg2: бакчаосэтӥд
     бакча+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg3: бакчаосэтӥз
     бакча+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl1: бакчаосэтӥмы
     бакча+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl2: бакчаосэтӥды
     бакча+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl3: бакчаосэтӥзы

     бакча+N+Pl+Apr+PxSg1: бакчаелань
     бакча+N+Pl+Apr+PxSg2: бакчаедлань
     бакча+N+Pl+Apr+PxSg3: бакчаезлань
     бакча+N+Pl+Apr+PxPl1: бакчамылань
     бакча+N+Pl+Apr+PxPl2: бакчатылань
     бакча+N+Pl+Apr+PxPl3: бакчасылань

     бакча+N+Pl+Apr+PxSg1: бакчаосэлань
     бакча+N+Pl+Apr+PxSg2: бакчаосэдлань
     бакча+N+Pl+Apr+PxSg3: бакчаосэзлань
     бакча+N+Pl+Apr+PxPl1: бакчаосмылань
     бакча+N+Pl+Apr+PxPl2: бакчаостылань
     бакча+N+Pl+Apr+PxPl3: бакчаоссылань
